Oklahoma, session 2025, SB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Neighborhood Revitalization Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 38-124 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 991 Page 1


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the


“Oklahoma Neighborhood Revitalization Fund”. The fund shall be a


continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Department of


Commerce from the apportionment of sales tax prescribed by


subsection E of Section 1353 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes


and provided for the purpose of implementing Section 3 of this act.


All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce for the purpose provided for in this act.


Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the


State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 38-125 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The monies in the Oklahoma Neighborhood Revitalization Fund


shall be allocated by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce only to


municipalities having a population of less than twenty-five thousand


(25,000) persons according to the latest Federal Decennial Census


for improvements to sidewalks, street lighting, signage, roadside



Req. No. 991 Page 2


beautification, and other improvements that have a positive impact


on the aesthetic character of the municipality.


B. A municipality seeking funds for distribution pursuant to


the provisions of Section 2 of this act shall make application to


the Oklahoma Department of Commerce on such forms as may be


prescribed by the Department for such purpose. The initial


application shall be filed not later than May 1, 2026.


C. A municipality shall be required to provide twenty percent


(20%) of the total project costs in order to be eligible for


distribution of funds from the Oklahoma Neighborhood Revitalization


Fund.


D. The Department shall not consider any project that has a


total project cost exceeding Five Hundred Thousand Dollars


($500,000.00).


E. The Department shall review applications in the order in


which they are received and shall distribute funds based on analysis


of considerations of such factors as the Department may determine to


be relevant. The initial distribution of funds shall take place not


later than October 1, 2026. The Department shall transfer the


approved funds to the municipality for deposit into the municipal


general fund or such other public fund as the municipality shall


specify in its application.


F. Funds distributed pursuant to the provisions of this section


shall only be used by a municipality for the purposes provided in

Req. No. 991 Page 3


subsection A of this section and shall not be used for any other


purpose.


G. No municipality may be awarded more than one project under


the provisions of this section within a single fiscal year.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1353, as


last amended by Section 4, Chapter 441, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 1353), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1353. A. It is hereby declared to be the purpose of


the Oklahoma Sales Tax Code to provide funds for the financing of


the program provided for by the Oklahoma Social Security Act and to


provide revenues for the support of the functions of the state


government of Oklahoma, and for this purpose it is hereby expressly


provided that, revenues derived pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Sales Tax Code, subject to the apportionment requirements


for the Oklahoma Tax Commission and Office of Management and


Enterprise Services Joint Computer Enhancement Fund provided by


Section 265 of this title, and further subject to the apportionment


requirement provided in subsection subsections D and E of this


section, shall be apportioned as follows:


1. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the


following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be placed


to the credit of the General Revenue Fund to be paid out pursuant to


direct appropriation by the Legislature:


Fiscal Year Amount

Req. No. 991 Page 4


FY 2003 and FY 2004 86.04%


FY 2005 85.83%


FY 2006 85.54%


FY 2007 85.04%


FY 2008 through FY 2022 83.61%


FY 2023 through FY 2027 83.36%


FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 83.61%;


2. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer


to be placed to the credit of the Education Reform Revolving Fund of


the State Department of Education:


a. for FY 2003, FY 2004 and FY 2005, ten and forty-two


one-hundredths percent (10.42%),


b. for FY 2006 through FY 2020, ten and forty-six one-


hundredths percent (10.46%),


c. for FY 2021:


(1) for the month beginning July 1, 2020, through the


month ending August 31, 2020, ten and forty-six


one-hundredths percent (10.46%), and


(2) for the month beginning September 1, 2020,


through the month ending June 30, 2021, eleven


and ninety-six one-hundredths percent (11.96%),


and


d. for FY 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, ten and


forty-six one-hundredths percent (10.46%);

Req. No. 991 Page 5


3. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer


to be placed to the credit of the Teachers’ Retirement System


Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund:


Fiscal Year Amount


FY 2003 and FY 2004 3.54%


FY 2005 3.75%


FY 2006 4.0%


FY 2007 4.5%


FY 2008 through FY 2020 5.0%


FY 2021:


a. for the month beginning July


1, 2020, through the month


ending August 31, 2020 5.0%


b. for the month beginning


September 1, 2020, through


the month ending June 30,


2021 3.5%


FY 2022 5.0%


FY 2023 through FY 2027 5.25%


FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 5.0%;


4. a. except as otherwise provided in subparagraph b of this


paragraph, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022,


and for each fiscal year thereafter, eighty-seven one-



Req. No. 991 Page 6


hundredths percent (0.87%) shall be paid to the State


Treasurer to be further apportioned as follows:


(1) twenty-four percent (24%) shall be placed to the


credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion


Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such


apportionment exceed Five Million Dollars


($5,000,000.00) in any fiscal year,


(2) forty-four percent (44%) shall be placed to the


credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Capital


Improvement Revolving Fund, but in no event shall


such apportionment exceed Nine Million Dollars


($9,000,000.00) in any fiscal year, and


(3) thirty-two percent (32%) shall be placed to the


credit of the Oklahoma Route 66 Commission


Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such


apportionment exceed Six Million Six Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($6,600,000.00) in any fiscal


year, and


b. any amounts which exceed the limitations of


subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be placed to


the credit of the General Revenue Fund; and


5. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, and for each


fiscal year thereafter, six one-hundredths percent (0.06%) shall be


placed to the credit of the Oklahoma Historical Society Capital

Req. No. 991 Page 7


Improvement and Operations Revolving Fund, but in no event shall


such apportionment exceed the total amount apportioned pursuant to


this paragraph for the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any


amounts which exceed the limitations of this paragraph shall be


placed to the credit of the General Revenue Fund.


B. Provided, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and


every fiscal year thereafter, an amount of revenue shall be


apportioned to each municipality or county which levies a sales tax


subject to the provisions of Section 1357.10 of this title and


subsection F of Section 2701 of this title equal to the amount of


sales tax revenue of such municipality or county exempted by the


provisions of Section 1357.10 of this title and subsection F of


Section 2701 of this title. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall


promulgate and adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of


this subsection.


C. From the monies that would otherwise be apportioned to the


General Revenue Fund pursuant to subsection A of this section, there


shall be apportioned the following amounts:


1. For the month ending August 31, 2019:


a. Nine Million Six Hundred Thousand Dollars


($9,600,000.00) to the credit of the State Highway


Construction and Maintenance Fund created in Section


1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and



Req. No. 991 Page 8


b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of


the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund


created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


2. For the month ending September 30, 2019:


a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit


of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund


created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and


b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of


the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund


created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


3. For the month ending October 31, 2019:


a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit


of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund


created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and


b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of


the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund


created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


4. For the month ending November 30, 2019:



Req. No. 991 Page 9


a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit


of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund


created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and


b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of


the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund


created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma


Statutes; and


5. For the month ending December 31, 2019:


a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit


of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund


created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and


b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of


the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund


created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


D. For fiscal year 2029, and each subsequent fiscal year, Fifty


Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) shall be placed to the credit of


the Oklahoma Capital Assets Maintenance and Protection Fund created


in Section 2 188B of this act Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


E. For fiscal year 2026, and each subsequent fiscal year, the


first Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) shall be placed to the



Req. No. 991 Page 10


credit of the Oklahoma Neighborhood Revitalization Fund created in


Section 2 of this act.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-991 MSBB 12/30/2024 10:46:13 AM































Req. No. 991 Page 11